Massachusetts, session 194th, H2953.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and in order
to promote the public good, the State Retirement Board shall enact the following. Sgt. David
Patterson, a Sgt in Massachusetts State Police Gang Unit, who was injured in the line of duty and
who as a result, is permanently incapacitated from performing the essential duties of a police
officer. (b) The annual amount of pension payable to David Patterson shall be equal to the
regular rate of compensation which would have been payable to him had he continued in service
as a police officer at the grade held by him at the time of his retirement. The benefits will
continue to be funded and administered by the Massachusetts State Board of Retirement as they
are now, consistent to Chapter 32, except that sections 8 and 91A of said Chapter 32 shall not
apply. All amounts paid under this act shall continue to be non-taxable to the extent allowable
under state law. (c) Upon attaining retirement age, David Patterson shall receive a pension
pursuant to section 7 of chapter 32, the yearly amount of which shall be equal to 75 per cent of
of 2

the average annual amount of pension paid to him in the previous 12 months. (d) David Patterson
lone dependent as already identified by the MSBR, then upon his death, said retirement board
shall pay his surviving dependent if then living, a pension payable in Monthly installments in the
amount of 75 percent of the annualized amount of the pension payable to David Patterson on the
date of his death. The pension shall be subject to section 103 of said chapter 32.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2